Washington statutes.
RCW 41.35.900

Benefits not contractual right until September 1, 2000.

The benefits provided pursuant to chapter 341, Laws of 1998 are not provided to employees as a matter of contractual right prior to September 1, 2000. The legislature retains the right to alter or abolish these benefits at any time prior to September 1, 2000.

[ 1998 c 341 s 713.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1998 c 341: See note following RCW 41.34.060.